Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-221
Certification request; contents.

A certification request shall set forth (1) the questions of law to be answered and (2) a statement of all facts relevant to the questions certified and showing fully the nature of the controversy in which the questions arose.

Laws 1982, LB 724, § 3.

The Nebraska Supreme Court will not accept a federal district court's certified question from an action challenging a city ordinance when the question fails to specify the nature of the plaintiffs' challenge to the ordinance on state law grounds and fails to identify any state statutes or state constitutional provisions that were allegedly violated. Keller v. City of Fremont, 280 Neb. 788, 790 N.W.2d 711 (2010).